Louisiana, session 2026, HB819.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1203.1(A)(introductory paragraph) and (6), (B), and (M) are
hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1203.1. Definitions; medical treatment schedule; medical advisory council
A. For use in this Section, the following terms have the following meanings,
unless clearly indicated otherwise by the context For the purpose of this Section,
unless clearly indicated otherwise by the context, the following terms have the
meanings ascribed to them:
* * *
(6)(a) "Schedule" means the medical treatment schedule to be developed by
the council and promulgated by the office and the assistant secretary or the Official
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1128 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 819
Disability Guidelines (ODG) by MCG, which are evidence-based, medical treatment
that is delivered and consistent with either the schedule promulgated by the office
and the assistant secretary or a schedule utilizing the ODG.
(b) The schedule shall be tacitly approved and not be subject to prior
authorization by the employer.
* * *
B.(1) The employer shall pay any invoice of the medical provider that is
consistent with the schedule, net thirty days of the invoice.
(2) The employer may challenge the delivery of care consistent with the
schedule. The employer shall show, by clear and convincing evidence, that the care
was not medically necessary. The assistant secretary shall, through the office of
workers' compensation administration, promulgate rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq., to establish a medical treatment
schedule.
(1) Such rules shall be promulgated no later than January 1, 2011.
(2) The medical treatment schedule shall meet the criteria established in this
Section and shall be organized in an interdisciplinary manner by particular regions
of the body and organ systems.
* * *
M.(1) With regard to all treatment not covered by the medical treatment
schedule promulgated in accordance with this Section, all medical care, services, and
treatment shall be in accordance with Subsection D of this Section. With regard to
all treatment not covered in the Official Disability Guidelines (ODG) by MCG, all
medical care, services, and treatment shall do all of the following:
(1) Rely on specified, comprehensive, and ongoing systematic medical
literature review.
(2) Contain published criteria for rating studies and for determining the
overall strength of the medical evidence, including the size of the sample, whether
the authors and researchers had any financial interest in the product or service being
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1128 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 819
studied, the design of the study and identification of any bias, and the statistical
significance of the study.
(3) Be the current and most recent version produced, which shall mean the
documented evidence can be produced or verified that the guideline was developed,
reviewed, or revised within the previous five years.
(4) Be interdisciplinary and address the frequency, duration, intensity, and
appropriateness of treatment procedures and modalities for all disciplines commonly
performing treatment of employment-related injuries and diseases.
(5) Be, by statute or rule, adopted by any other state regarding medical
treatment for workers' compensation injuries, diseases, or conditions.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, all treatment not
specified in the medical treatment schedule and not found in Subsection D of this
Section shall be due by the employer when it is demonstrated to the medical director,
in accordance with the principles of Subsection C of this Section, that a
preponderance of the scientific medical evidence supports approval of the treatment
that is not covered.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 23:1203.1(C) through (I) and (O) are hereby repealed in their
entirety.
Section 3.(A) If, after two years from the enactment of this Act, there is not a
reduction of the average costs of medical care, services, and treatment under the updated
medical treatment schedule, which is in conjunction with the Official Disability Guidelines,
as amended and reenacted by Section 1 of this Act, the medical treatment schedule shall be
developed by the medical advisory council and promulgated by the office of workers'
compensation administration and its assistant secretary.
(B) The assistant secretary of the office of workers' compensation administration
shall promulgate any necessary rules in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act
to establish the medical treatment schedule.
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1128 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 819